Utah statutes.
57-3-204.   Constructive notice -- Effect as between direct parties to
mortgage or trust deed.
(1)  The recording of a mortgage or trust deed that incorporates a provision
of a master form in accordance with Section 57-3-203, operates as constructive
notice of the mortgage or trust deed, including all incorporated provisions of
the referenced master form.
(2)  Nothing in this part modifies the law regarding the effectiveness of a
mortgage, trust deed, or contract as between:
(a)  the mortgagor and mortgagee of the mortgage; or
(b)  the trustor, beneficiary, and trustee under a trust deed.
